Colorado, session 2026A, HB1270.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
-2- HB26-1270

SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the
"Agricultural Data Ownership and Market Competition Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration.
(1) The general assembly finds and declares that:
(a) American agricultural producers generate billions of dollars'
worth of data annually, including yield monitor data, soil analyses, field
prescriptions, weather correlations, precision agriculture measurements,
livestock health metrics, and operational performance data;
(b) Agricultural producers currently surrender this valuable data
to equipment manufacturers, platform companies, and data service
providers through opaque terms of service, often receiving no
compensation for the data and maintaining no control of usage of the
data;
(c) Seed companies, insurers, commodity traders, agricultural
technology firms, financial institutions, government agencies, and others
pay premium prices to equipment manufacturers, platform companies,
and data service providers for agricultural data insights while agricultural
producers receive no portion of this value;
(d) Data monopolies concentrate market power with equipment
manufacturers and platform companies, which harms agricultural
producers and rural communities;
(e) Agriculture is a critical sector of vital importance to Colorado's
economy, food security, and community development;
(f) Raw agricultural data, consisting of factual observations and
measurements generated directly from agricultural equipment and
operations, cannot be copyrighted under federal law; however, when raw
agricultural data is transformed through creative processes, analytical
-3- HB26-1270

methods, or proprietary algorithms, this transformed agricultural data may
be considered intellectual property and is eligible for full ownership
protection;
(g) Establishing clear agricultural data ownership principles that
recognize agricultural producers' full copyright ownership of transformed
agricultural data will empower agricultural producers to capture fair
market value for their data while promoting transparency, competition,
and innovation in the agricultural sector;
(h) Preventing excessive market concentration in agricultural data
collection and transformation is essential to preserving competitive
markets, ensuring fair prices for agricultural producers, and avoiding the
harms associated with monopolistic practices;
(i) Implementing excise tax compliance mechanisms for
transformed agricultural data transactions will generate state revenue,
create transparency regarding data value, and empower agricultural
producers to understand the worth of their agricultural data assets; and
(j) Therefore, it is in the best interests of Coloradans to establish
clear and comprehensive regulations on agricultural data ownership and
usage that support agricultural producers, the agricultural industry, and
local communities.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 2.5 to title
35 as follows:
ARTICLE 2.5
Agricultural Data Ownership and
Market Competition
35-2.5-101. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 2.5, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
-4- HB26-1270

REQUIRES:
(1) "AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 6-1-1502 (1).
(2) "AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER" MEANS A PERSON ENGAGED IN
AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTION OPERATIONS AS A LANDOWNER, TENANT
FARMER, CONTRACT GROWER, LIVESTOCK OWNER, OR OTHER
AGRICULTURAL OPERATOR.
(3) "AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTION OPERATIONS" MEANS ANY
ACTIVITY CONDUCTED FOR THE PURPOSE OF PRODUCING AGRICULTURAL
COMMODITIES, INCLUDING CROP PRODUCTION, LIVESTOCK PRODUCTION,
AQUACULTURE, VITICULTURE, OR SIMILAR ACTIVITIES.
(4) "COMMISSIONER" MEANS THE COMMISSIONER OF
AGRICULTURE.
(5) "DATA OWNER" MEANS A PERSON THAT HOLDS OWNERSHIP
RIGHTS IN RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA OR OWNERSHIP RIGHTS IN
TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA PURSUANT TO SECTION 35-2.5-102.
(6) (a) "DATA SERVICE PROVIDER" MEANS A PERSON THAT
COLLECTS, RECEIVES, ACCESSES, TRANSMITS, STORES, PROCESSES,
TRANSFORMS, AGGREGATES, ANALYZES, SELLS, LICENSES, OR OTHERWISE
COMMERCIALIZES RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA OR TRANSFORMED
AGRICULTURAL DATA.
(b) "DATA SERVICE PROVIDER" INCLUDES:
(I) AN ORIGINAL EQUIPMENT MANUFACTURER, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 6-1-1502 (8);
(II) A PLATFORM PROVIDER THAT OPERATES A DIGITAL PLATFORM,
APPLICATION, OR SERVICE THROUGH WHICH RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA OR
TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA IS COLLECTED, CREATED, STORED,
-5- HB26-1270

TRANSMITTED, PROCESSED, OR OTHERWISE MADE AVAILABLE;
(III) A DATA AGGREGATOR THAT COLLECTS, COMPILES, OR
PROCESSES RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA FROM MULTIPLE AGRICULTURAL
PRODUCERS;
(IV) AN ENTITY THAT TRANSFORMS RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA
INTO TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA; AND
(V) AN ENTITY THAT SELLS, LICENSES, OR OTHERWISE
COMMERCIALIZES RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA OR TRANSFORMED
AGRICULTURAL DATA.
(7) "DATA TRANSACTION" MEANS ANY SALE, LICENSE, TRANSFER,
SUBSCRIPTION, GRANT OF ACCESS, OR OTHER COMMERCIAL EXCHANGE OF
TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA OR OWNERSHIP RIGHTS, WHETHER
FOR A ONE-TIME PAYMENT, RECURRING FEES, ROYALTIES, OR OTHER
CONSIDERATION.
(8) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
CREATED IN SECTION 35-1-103.
(9) "LANDOWNER" MEANS A PERSON THAT HOLDS A FEE SIMPLE,
LIFE ESTATE, OR OTHER POSSESSORY INTEREST IN AGRICULTURAL LAND.
(10) "LIVESTOCK OWNER" MEANS A PERSON THAT HOLDS
OWNERSHIP RIGHTS IN LIVESTOCK, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 35-1-102 (6).
(11) "MARKETS FOR TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA" MEANS
THE COMMERCIAL CHANNELS AND PURCHASERS OF TRANSFORMED
AGRICULTURAL DATA, INCLUDING:
(a) CROP INSURANCE COMPANIES AND REINSURERS SEEKING
ACTUARIAL DATA AND RISK ASSESSMENTS;
(b) SEED COMPANIES AND AGRICULTURAL BIOTECHNOLOGY FIRMS
SEEKING PERFORMANCE VALIDATION DATA;
-6- HB26-1270

(c) COMMODITY TRADERS AND FUTURES MARKETS SEEKING
SUPPLY FORECASTS AND PRODUCTION ANALYTICS;
(d) AGRICULTURAL LENDERS AND FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS
SEEKING CREDITWORTHINESS ASSESSMENTS AND COLLATERAL
VALUATIONS;
(e) CARBON CREDIT REGISTRIES AND ENVIRONMENTAL MARKETS
SEEKING SEQUESTRATION VERIFICATION;
(f) GOVERNMENT AGENCIES SEEKING PROGRAM COMPLIANCE
VERIFICATION OR STATISTICAL DATA;
(g) FOOD PROCESSORS AND RETAILERS SEEKING SUPPLY CHAIN
TRANSPARENCY AND SUSTAINABILITY DOCUMENTATION;
(h) AGRICULTURAL INPUT SUPPLIERS SEEKING MARKET
INTELLIGENCE AND DEMAND FORECASTING;
(i) LAND VALUATION SERVICES AND REAL ESTATE MARKETS
SEEKING PRODUCTIVITY ASSESSMENTS;
(j) RESEARCH INSTITUTIONS AND UNIVERSITIES SEEKING DATA FOR
AGRICULTURAL STUDIES;
(k) WATER DISTRICTS AND IRRIGATION AUTHORITIES SEEKING
USAGE OPTIMIZATION DATA; AND
(l) ANY OTHER COMMERCIAL, GOVERNMENTAL, ACADEMIC, OR
NONPROFIT ENTITY THAT DERIVES VALUE FROM TRANSFORMED
AGRICULTURAL DATA.
(12) (a) "RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA" MEANS UNPROCESSED
FACTUAL INFORMATION AND ALL DATA THAT IS GENERATED DIRECTLY
FROM AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTION OPERATIONS, AGRICULTURAL
EQUIPMENT OPERATIONS, OR AGRICULTURAL LAND AND THAT:
(I) HAS NOT BEEN CONVERTED TO TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL
-7- HB26-1270

DATA; AND
(II) CONSISTS OF FACTUAL OBSERVATIONS AND MEASUREMENTS
THAT CANNOT BE COPYRIGHTED UNDER FEDERAL COPYRIGHT LAW.
(b) "RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA" INCLUDES:
(I) YIELD DATA, SOIL DATA, CROP DATA, AND FIELD DATA AS
DIRECTLY RECORDED BY EQUIPMENT OR MANUAL OBSERVATION;
(II) PRECISION AGRICULTURAL DATA, INCLUDING GPS
COORDINATES, APPLICATION RATES, AND SENSOR READINGS;
(III) EQUIPMENT OPERATION DATA, DIAGNOSTIC DATA,
TELEMATICS DATA, AND MACHINE PERFORMANCE DATA AS GENERATED BY
EQUIPMENT SYSTEMS;
(IV) LIVESTOCK DATA, INCLUDING HEALTH RECORDS, PRODUCTION
METRICS, BREEDING DATA, AND PERFORMANCE MEASUREMENTS;
(V) WEATHER DATA, ENVIRONMENTAL DATA, AND CLIMATE DATA
SPECIFIC TO AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTION OPERATIONS;
(VI) INPUT DATA, INCLUDING SEED, FERTILIZER, PESTICIDE,
HERBICIDE, DIESEL EMISSION FLUID, AND FUEL USAGE DATA; AND
(VII) FINANCIAL DATA SPECIFIC TO AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTION
OPERATIONS.
(13) "TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA" MEANS RAW
AGRICULTURAL DATA THAT HAS BEEN PROCESSED, ANALYZED,
AGGREGATED, COMPILED, OR OTHERWISE TRANSFORMED THROUGH THE
APPLICATION OF PROPRIETARY ALGORITHMS, ANALYTICAL METHODS,
CREATIVE ARRANGEMENT, OR OTHER INTELLECTUAL PROCESSES
SUFFICIENT TO PRODUCE INFORMATION THAT MAY BE COPYRIGHTED AS
INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY UNDER FEDERAL COPYRIGHT LAW, INCLUDING:
(a) AGRONOMIC ANALYSES AND RECOMMENDATIONS DERIVED
-8- HB26-1270

FROM RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA;
(b) PREDICTIVE MODELS AND YIELD FORECASTS BASED ON
HISTORICAL AND CURRENT DATA;
(c) FIELD PRESCRIPTIONS AND VARIABLE RATE APPLICATION MAPS;
(d) COMPARATIVE BENCHMARK REPORTS AND PERFORMANCE
ANALYSES;
(e) VALIDATED FARMING PRACTICES DOCUMENTED AND
SUBSTANTIATED THROUGH OPERATIONAL DATA;
(f) CROP INSURANCE RISK ASSESSMENTS AND ACTUARIAL
ANALYSES;
(g) CARBON SEQUESTRATION QUANTIFICATION AND
ENVIRONMENTAL CREDIT DOCUMENTATION;
(h) SUPPLY CHAIN OPTIMIZATION ANALYSES AND LOGISTICAL
MODELS;
(i) EQUIPMENT EFFICIENCY ANALYSES AND MAINTENANCE
PREDICTION MODELS;
(j) SUSTAINABILITY CERTIFICATIONS AND COMPLIANCE
DOCUMENTATION;
(k) MARKET TIMING ANALYSES AND COMMODITY TRADING
INSIGHTS;
(l) INPUT OPTIMIZATION RECOMMENDATIONS AND RESOURCE
EFFICIENCY ANALYSES; AND
(m) ANY OTHER COMPILATION, ANALYSIS, OR DERIVATIVE WORK
THAT MEETS THE ORIGINALITY THRESHOLD FOR COPYRIGHT PROTECTION
UNDER FEDERAL LAW.
35-2.5-102. Raw agricultural data ownership - transformed
agricultural data ownership - rights of agricultural producers - types
-9- HB26-1270

of agricultural data.
(1) AN AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER THAT GENERATES RAW
AGRICULTURAL DATA FROM THE AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER'S
AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT OR AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTION OPERATIONS
RETAINS OWNERSHIP OF THAT RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA AND MAY:
(a) ACCESS, POSSESS, AND CONTROL THE RAW AGRICULTURAL
DATA;
(b) RECEIVE COPIES OF THE RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA IN A
STANDARDIZED, PORTABLE, MACHINE-READABLE FORMAT FROM A DATA
SERVICE PROVIDER;
(c) SHARE THE RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA WITH A DATA SERVICE
PROVIDER OF THE AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER'S CHOOSING;
(d) REQUEST DELETION OF THE RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA FROM
A DATA SERVICE PROVIDER'S SYSTEMS;
(e) RECEIVE INFORMATION REGARDING HOW THE RAW
AGRICULTURAL DATA IS BEING USED, TRANSFORMED, AND
COMMERCIALIZED FROM A DATA SERVICE PROVIDER; AND
(f) RECEIVE FAIR MARKET VALUE COMPENSATION FROM A DATA
SERVICE PROVIDER WHEN THE RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA IS USED TO
CREATE TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA OR IS OTHERWISE
COMMERCIALIZED.
(2) AN AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER THAT PROVIDES RAW
AGRICULTURAL DATA TO A DATA SERVICE PROVIDER THAT CONVERTS THE
RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA INTO TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA HAS
FULL OWNERSHIP RIGHTS OF THE TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA AND
MAY:
(a) COPYRIGHT THE TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA;
-10- HB26-1270

(b) REPRODUCE THE TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA;
(c) PREPARE OR CONTRACT FOR THE PREPARATION OF DERIVATIVE
WORKS BASED UPON THE TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA;
(d) DISTRIBUTE COPIES OF THE TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL
DATA;
(e) DISPLAY THE TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA PUBLICLY;
(f) LICENSE OR SELL THE TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA IN
ANY MARKET AND FOR ANY LAWFUL PURPOSE; AND
(g) RECEIVE FAIR MARKET VALUE COMPENSATION FROM A DATA
SERVICE PROVIDER WHEN THE TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA IS
COMMERCIALIZED BY OTHERS.
(3) (a) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (2), (4), AND (5) OF
THIS SECTION, RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA GENERATED BY A LANDOWNER
FROM CROP PRODUCTION OPERATIONS AND TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL
DATA DERIVED FROM THAT RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA BELONGS TO THE
LANDOWNER OF THE AGRICULTURAL LAND FROM WHICH THE RAW
AGRICULTURAL DATA WAS GENERATED.
(b) A LANDOWNER THAT LEASES LAND TO A TENANT FARMER OR
OTHER AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER RETAINS OWNERSHIP OF THE RAW
AGRICULTURAL DATA GENERATED FROM CROP PRODUCTION ON THAT
LAND, UNLESS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN
THE LANDOWNER AND THE TENANT FARMER OR OTHER AGRICULTURAL
PRODUCER.
(4) (a) RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA GENERATED FROM LIVESTOCK
OPERATIONS, OR LIVESTOCK DATA, AND TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL
DATA DERIVED FROM THAT RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA BELONGS TO THE
OWNER OF THE LIVESTOCK FROM WHICH THE RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA
-11- HB26-1270

WAS GENERATED REGARDLESS OF WHERE THE LIVESTOCK IS HOUSED OR IF
SOMEONE OTHER THAN THE LIVESTOCK OWNER MANAGES THE LIVESTOCK,
UNLESS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE
PARTIES.
(b) THE LANDOWNER OF THE LAND ON WHICH THE LIVESTOCK
OPERATIONS ARE CONDUCTED, AND THAT IS NOT THE LIVESTOCK OWNER,
DOES NOT OWN AND HAS NO CLAIM TO THE LIVESTOCK DATA GENERATED
FROM THE LIVESTOCK OPERATIONS UNLESS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY
WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE LIVESTOCK OWNER AND THE
LANDOWNER.
(5) (a) RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA GENERATED FROM
AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT DURING AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTION
OPERATIONS THAT IS RELATED TO THE USE OF THE AGRICULTURAL
EQUIPMENT, OR EQUIPMENT OPERATION DATA, AND TRANSFORMED
AGRICULTURAL DATA DERIVED FROM THAT RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA
BELONGS TO THE OWNER OR LESSEE OF THE AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT AT
THE TIME THE RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA WAS GENERATED, UNLESS
OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE PARTIES.
(b) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION, AND
EVEN IF AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT IS USED DURING CROP PRODUCTION,
RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA GENERATED FROM CROP PRODUCTION BELONGS
TO THE LANDOWNER IF THE RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA IS RELATED TO THE
CROP PRODUCTION. IF THE RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA IS EQUIPMENT
OPERATION DATA AND IS RELATED TO THE USE OF THE AGRICULTURAL
EQUIPMENT IN THE CROP PRODUCTION, THE RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA
BELONGS TO THE OWNER OR LESSEE OF THE AGRICULTURAL EQUIPMENT.
(6) (a) A DATA OWNER'S RIGHTS REGARDING RAW AGRICULTURAL
-12- HB26-1270

DATA OR TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA GRANTED PURSUANT TO
THIS ARTICLE 2.5 MAY NOT BE WAIVED OR TRANSFERRED BY A
BROWSEWRAP AGREEMENT, A CLICKWRAP AGREEMENT, TERMS OF
SERVICE, AN END USER LICENSE AGREEMENT, OR A SIMILAR INSTRUMENT.
(b) A DATA OWNER'S RIGHTS REGARDING RAW AGRICULTURAL
DATA OR TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA MAY BE WAIVED,
TRANSFERRED, OR VOIDED ONLY IF THE DATA OWNER PROVIDES EXPRESS,
INFORMED, WRITTEN CONSENT THAT SPECIFICALLY ACKNOWLEDGES THE
WAIVER, TRANSFER, OR VOIDING OF THAT RIGHT.
(7) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO
THE CONTRARY, THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT PARTIES FROM
NEGOTIATING ALTERNATIVE OWNERSHIP AND REVENUE-SHARING
ARRANGEMENTS FOR RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA OR TRANSFORMED
AGRICULTURAL DATA THROUGH WRITTEN AGREEMENT.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, AN AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER MAY NEGOTIATE OWNERSHIP
AND REVENUE-SHARING ARRANGEMENTS FOR THE AGRICULTURAL
PRODUCER'S RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA OR TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL
DATA, INCLUDING SPECIFIC SHARING ARRANGEMENTS FOR:
(I) TENANT FARMING;
(II) SHARECROPPING;
(III) CONTRACT GROWING OPERATIONS;
(IV) CUSTOM FARMING OPERATIONS; AND
(V) EQUIPMENT LEASING ARRANGEMENTS.
35-2.5-103. Agricultural producer data monetization rights -
limits on data service providers - revenue sharing.
(1) AN AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER MAY MONETIZE, EITHER
-13- HB26-1270

DIRECTLY OR THROUGH A DATA SERVICE PROVIDER OF THE AGRICULTURAL
PRODUCER'S CHOOSING, THE AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER'S TRANSFORMED
AGRICULTURAL DATA BY DIRECTLY SELLING, LICENSING, OR OTHERWISE
COMMERCIALIZING THE DATA IN MARKETS FOR TRANSFORMED
AGRICULTURAL DATA.
(2) A DATA SERVICE PROVIDER SHALL NOT:
(a) PREVENT, RESTRICT, OR IMPEDE AN AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER
FROM MONETIZING THE AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER'S TRANSFORMED
AGRICULTURAL DATA THROUGH THIRD PARTIES;
(b) LIMIT OR RESTRICT THE TYPES OF MARKETS FOR TRANSFORMED
AGRICULTURAL DATA THAT THE AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER MAY
PARTICIPATE IN;
(c) IMPOSE CONTRACTUAL PROVISIONS THAT GRANT THE DATA
SERVICE PROVIDER EXCLUSIVE RIGHTS TO THE AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER'S
RAW AGRICULTURAL DATA OR TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA
WITHOUT FAIR MARKET VALUE COMPENSATION AND THE INFORMED
CONSENT OF THE AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER; OR
(d) DISCRIMINATE OR RETALIATE AGAINST AN AGRICULTURAL
PRODUCER IN TERMS, PRICING, OR SERVICE BASED ON THE AGRICULTURAL
PRODUCER'S MONETIZATION OF THE TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA.
(3) WHEN A DATA SERVICE PROVIDER SELLS, LICENSES, OR
OTHERWISE COMMERCIALIZES TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA:
(a) THE DATA OWNER MUST RECEIVE FAIR MARKET VALUE
COMPENSATION FOR THE USE OF THE DATA OWNER'S TRANSFORMED
AGRICULTURAL DATA, WHICH COMPENSATION SHALL BE DISCLOSED BY THE
DATA SERVICE PROVIDER PRIOR TO THE TRANSACTION;
(b) THE DATA SERVICE PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE THE DATA
-14- HB26-1270

OWNER WITH A TRANSPARENT ACCOUNTING OF ALL TRANSACTIONS
INVOLVING THE DATA OWNER'S TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA UPON
REQUEST, INCLUDING THE MARKETS IN WHICH THE TRANSFORMED
AGRICULTURAL DATA WAS SOLD;
(c) ANY REVENUE-SHARING ARRANGEMENTS ESTABLISHED
BETWEEN THE DATA OWNER AND THE DATA SERVICE PROVIDER MUST BE
EXECUTED BY WRITTEN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE PARTIES AND SPECIFY
THE PERCENTAGE OR AMOUNT OF REVENUE THAT IS PAID TO THE DATA
OWNER; AND
(d) THE DATA SERVICE PROVIDER MAY CONTRACT WITH OTHER
PERSONS TO FACILITATE PAYMENT OF REVENUE SHARES TO DATA OWNERS
BUT SHALL NOT REDUCE OR DELAY PAYMENTS TO THE DATA OWNER.
35-2.5-104. Excise tax on transformed agricultural data
transactions - administration and enforcement - exemptions - rules
- referred measure - voter approval - ballot title - estimate of revenue
- definition - repeal.
(1) (a) ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2027, IF A MAJORITY OF THE
ELECTORS VOTING ON THE BALLOT ISSUE VOTE "YES/FOR", THERE IS
LEVIED AN EXCISE TAX UPON A DATA SERVICE PROVIDER AT A RATE OF
THREE PERCENT OF THE NET TAXABLE SALES FROM A DATA TRANSACTION
INVOLVING TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA THAT OCCURS WITHIN
THIS STATE OR INVOLVING AN AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER WITHIN THIS
STATE.
(b) THE DETERMINATION OF WHETHER A RETAIL SALE OCCURS IN
THIS STATE IS GOVERNED BY THE PROVISIONS SET FORTH IN SECTION
39-26-104 (3)(a)(I) TO (3)(a)(V) AND THE DEFINITIONS SET FORTH IN
SECTION 39-26-104 (3)(d)(I) AND (3)(d)(II).
-15- HB26-1270

(c) A DATA TRANSACTION INVOLVING ONLY RAW AGRICULTURAL
DATA IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE EXCISE TAX LEVIED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) A DATA SERVICE PROVIDER THAT FACILITATES A DATA
TRANSACTION INVOLVING TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA SHALL:
(a) CALCULATE AND COLLECT THE APPLICABLE EXCISE TAXES ON
THE DATA TRANSACTION; AND
(b) PROVIDE EACH OWNER OF THE TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL
DATA WITH DOCUMENTATION OF ANY TAXES COLLECTED ON THE DATA
TRANSACTION.
(3) THE FOLLOWING DATA TRANSACTIONS ARE EXEMPT FROM THE
EXCISE TAX LEVIED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION:
(a) DATA TRANSACTIONS CONDUCTED FOR RESEARCH PURPOSES BY
LAND-GRANT UNIVERSITIES OR AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH INSTITUTIONS;
(b) DATA TRANSACTIONS CONDUCTED BY GOVERNMENTAL
ENTITIES FOR REGULATORY OR STATISTICAL PURPOSES; AND
(c) DATA TRANSACTIONS WITHIN AGRICULTURAL COOPERATIVES
THAT ARE SOLELY FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE COOPERATIVE'S MEMBERS.
(4) (a) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSIONER, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
REVENUE, SHALL ADOPT RULES NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT AND ENFORCE
THIS SECTION, INCLUDING:
(I) VALUATION METHODS FOR TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL
DATA TRANSACTIONS;
(II) REPORTING REQUIREMENTS FOR DATA SERVICE PROVIDERS;
AND
(III) PROCEDURES FOR TAX COLLECTION AND REMITTANCE.
-16- HB26-1270

(b) (I) THE COMMISSIONER, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, SHALL MAKE A
REFUND OR ALLOW A CREDIT TO ANY DATA SERVICE PROVIDER THAT
ESTABLISHES THAT THE DATA SERVICE PROVIDER HAS OVERPAID THE TAX
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. NO SUCH REFUND SHALL BE MADE OR CREDIT
ALLOWED IN AN AMOUNT GREATER THAN THE TAX PAID.
(II) THE DATA SERVICE PROVIDER MUST FILE ANY CLAIM FOR
REFUND OR CREDIT UNDER THIS SECTION WITHIN THREE YEARS AFTER THE
DUE DATE OF THE RETURN SHOWING THE OVERPAYMENT. THE CLAIM MUST
BE MADE ON FORMS PRESCRIBED BY THE COMMISSIONER AND MUST
INCLUDE SUCH PERTINENT INFORMATION OR DOCUMENTATION AS THE
COMMISSIONER MAY REQUIRE.
(III) UPON RECEIPT OF THE APPLICATION AND PROOF OF THE
MATTERS CONTAINED THEREIN, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL GIVE NOTICE
TO THE DATA SERVICE PROVIDER, IN WRITING, OF THE COMMISSIONER'S
DECISION. AGGRIEVED DATA SERVICE PROVIDERS MAY PETITION THE
COMMISSIONER FOR A HEARING ON THE CLAIM.
(c) (I) A DATA SERVICE PROVIDER SHALL KEEP COMPLETE AND
ACCURATE RECORDS NECESSARY FOR THE DETERMINATION OF THE
CORRECT TAX LIABILITY, INCLUDING INVOICES OF ANY DATA
TRANSACTIONS WITH A DATA OWNER CONDUCTED IN THIS STATE OR WITH
AGRICULTURAL PRODUCERS WITHIN THIS STATE.
(II) A DATA SERVICE PROVIDER SHALL PROVIDE A COPY OF THE
RECORDS REQUIRED TO BE KEPT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(c)(I) OF
THIS SECTION, AND ANY OTHER RECORDS DEEMED NECESSARY BY THE
COMMISSIONER, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, FOR THE DETERMINATION OF THE CORRECT TAX
-17- HB26-1270

LIABILITY BY THE COMMISSIONER. THE COMMISSIONER, IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, MAY
ESTABLISH THE ACCEPTABLE FORM OF THE RECORDS.
(d) (I) A DATA SERVICE PROVIDER SHALL FILE A RETURN WITH THE
COMMISSIONER EACH MONTH. THE RETURN, WHICH MUST BE UPON FORMS
PRESCRIBED AND FURNISHED BY THE COMMISSIONER, IN CONSULTATION
WITH THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, MUST
CONTAIN THE NET TAXABLE SALES FROM A DATA TRANSACTION INVOLVING
TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA THAT OCCURS WITHIN THE STATE OR
INVOLVING AN AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER WITHIN THIS STATE, THE TAX
DUE THEREON, AND ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE COMMISSIONER
MAY REASONABLY REQUIRE.
(II) A DATA SERVICE PROVIDER SHALL FILE THE RETURN REQUIRED
BY SUBSECTION (4)(d)(I) OF THIS SECTION WITH THE COMMISSIONER BY
THE TWENTIETH DAY OF THE MONTH FOLLOWING THE MONTH REPORTED
AND WITH THE REPORT SHALL REMIT THE AMOUNT OF TAX DUE. THE DATA
SERVICE PROVIDER SHALL FILE THE RETURN ELECTRONICALLY AND REMIT
THE AMOUNT OF TAX DUE BY ELECTRONIC FUNDS TRANSFER.
(III) THE COMMISSIONER MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR FILING A
RETURN AND REMITTING THE TAX DUE FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN OR UNDER
SUCH REASONABLE RULES AS THE COMMISSIONER, IN CONSULTATION WITH
THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, MAY ADOPT.
(IV) IF A DATA SERVICE PROVIDER NEGLECTS OR REFUSES TO FILE
A TIMELY RETURN OR PAYMENT OF THE TAX, TO PAY OR CORRECTLY
ACCOUNT FOR ANY TAX AS REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION, OR TO KEEP
COMPLETE AND ACCURATE RECORDS AS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (4)(c)
OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSIONER, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
-18- HB26-1270

EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, SHALL MAKE AN
ESTIMATE, BASED UPON THE INFORMATION AVAILABLE, OF THE AMOUNT
OF TAX DUE OR NOT ACCOUNTED FOR OR INCORRECTLY ACCOUNTED FOR
ON A RETURN FOR THE PERIOD FOR WHICH THE DATA SERVICE PROVIDER IS
DELINQUENT. THE COMMISSIONER, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, SHALL ADD TO
THE ESTIMATED AMOUNT OF TAX DUE OR NOT ACCOUNTED FOR OR
INCORRECTLY ACCOUNTED FOR INTEREST AND A PENALTY EQUAL TO TEN
PERCENT OF SUCH UNPAID, UNACCOUNTED, OR INCORRECTLY ACCOUNTED
FOR AMOUNT OF TAX, PLUS ONE-HALF PERCENT PER MONTH FROM THE
DATE WHEN DUE, NOT TO EXCEED EIGHTEEN PERCENT IN THE AGGREGATE.
(5) Distribution of taxes collected.
(a) EACH MONTH, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT THE
MONEY COLLECTED FOR PAYMENT OF THE TAX LEVIED PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION TO THE OLD AGE PENSION FUND CREATED IN SECTION 1 OF
ARTICLE XXIV OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SECTION 2 (a) AND (f) OF ARTICLE XXIV OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION
AND SHALL FURTHER TRANSFER AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THIS AMOUNT
FROM THE OLD AGE PENSION FUND TO THE GENERAL FUND IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SECTION 7 (c) OF ARTICLE XXIV OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
(b) EACH MONTH, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER AN
AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT OF MONEY COLLECTED FOR PAYMENT OF
THE TAX LEVIED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION FROM THE GENERAL FUND TO
THE COLORADO AGRICULTURAL FUTURE LOAN PROGRAM CASH FUND
CREATED IN SECTION 35-1.2-105.
(6) Submission of ballot issue - definition - repeal.
(a) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, "BALLOT ISSUE" MEANS THE
-19- HB26-1270

QUESTION REFERRED TO VOTERS IN SUBSECTION (6)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) AT THE ELECTION HELD ON NOVEMBER 3, 2026, THE
SECRETARY OF STATE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE REGISTERED ELECTORS OF
THE STATE FOR THEIR APPROVAL OR REJECTION THE FOLLOWING BALLOT
ISSUE: "SHALL STATE TAXES BE INCREASED BY AN ESTIMATED $2,500,000
ANNUALLY BY IMPOSING AN EXCISE TAX ON COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
INVOLVING TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA GENERATED BY
COLORADO AGRICULTURAL PRODUCERS; AND USING THE TAX REVENUE
PRIMARILY FOR THE COLORADO AGRICULTURAL FUTURE LOAN PROGRAM
CASH FUND TO PROVIDE ASSISTANCE, INCLUDING EQUIPMENT FINANCING,
LOANS, AND LAND ACQUISITION ASSISTANCE, TO AGRICULTURAL
PRODUCERS THAT QUALIFY FOR THE COLORADO AGRICULTURAL FUTURE
LOAN PROGRAM WITH THE STATE KEEPING AND SPENDING ALL OF THE NEW
TAX REVENUE AS A VOTER-APPROVED REVENUE CHANGE?"
(c) FOR PURPOSES OF SECTION 1-5-407, THE BALLOT ISSUE IS A
PROPOSITION. SECTION 1-40-106 (3)(d) DOES NOT APPLY TO THE BALLOT
ISSUE.
(d) IF A MAJORITY OF THE ELECTORS VOTING ON THE BALLOT ISSUE
VOTE "NO/AGAINST", THEN THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027, AND AN EXCISE TAX ON DATA TRANSACTIONS
INVOLVING TRANSFORMED AGRICULTURAL DATA SHALL NOT BE
COLLECTED.
(7) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY LIMITATIONS ON REVENUE, SPENDING,
OR APPROPRIATIONS CONTAINED IN SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE
STATE CONSTITUTION OR ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, ALL REVENUE
GENERATED BY THE EXCISE TAX LEVIED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION AS
APPROVED BY THE VOTERS AT THE STATEWIDE ELECTION IN NOVEMBER
-20- HB26-1270

2026 MAY BE COLLECTED AND SPENT AS A VOTER-APPROVED REVENUE
CHANGE AND SHALL NOT REQUIRE VOTER APPROVAL SUBSEQUENT TO THE
VOTER APPROVAL REQUIRED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION.
35-2.5-105. Enforcement - unfair or deceptive trade practice
- penalty.
(1) A VIOLATION OF THIS ARTICLE 2.5 IS AN UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE
TRADE PRACTICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 6-1-105 (1)(qqqq).
(2) (a) IN ADDITION TO OTHER PENALTIES AVAILABLE, A DATA
SERVICE PROVIDER THAT VIOLATES THIS ARTICLE 2.5 IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL
PENALTY OF NOT MORE THAN FIFTY THOUSAND DOLLARS PER VIOLATION.
(b) EXCEPT FOR ANY RELIEF AWARDED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(3) OF THIS SECTION, ANY CIVIL PENALTIES AWARDED TO THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL OR THE DEPARTMENT FOR VIOLATIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 2.5
SHALL BE CREDITED TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(3) AN AGRICULTURAL PRODUCER OR DATA OWNER AGGRIEVED BY
A VIOLATION OF THIS ARTICLE 2.5 MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION IN A COURT
OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION AND, UPON PREVAILING, SHALL BE ENTITLED
TO:
(a) ACTUAL DAMAGES OR STATUTORY DAMAGES OF UP TO TEN
THOUSAND DOLLARS PER VIOLATION, WHICHEVER AMOUNT IS GREATER;
(b) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; AND
(c) REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES AND COSTS.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT HAS AUTHORITY TO ENFORCE THIS ARTICLE
2.5 AND MAY:
(a) RECEIVE AND INVESTIGATE COMPLAINTS ALLEGING VIOLATIONS
OF THIS ARTICLE 2.5;
(b) REFER COMPLAINTS TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FOR
-21- HB26-1270

ENFORCEMENT; AND
(c) PUBLISH ANNUAL REPORTS ON AGRICULTURAL DATA MARKET
CONCENTRATION AND COMPLIANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 2.5.
35-2.5-106. Repeal of article - subject to review.
THIS ARTICLE 2.5 IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1, 2037.
BEFORE THE REPEAL, THIS ARTICLE 2.5 IS SCHEDULED FOR REVIEW IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-34-104.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-1.2-105, amend
(1) introductory portion and (1)(b); and add (1)(b.5) as follows:
35-1.2-105. Colorado agricultural future loan program cash
fund - created - repeal.
(1) The Colorado agricultural future loan program cash fund is
hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of:
(b) Money received as loan payments on loans issued from the
loan program, including interest; and
(b.5) MONEY GENERATED FROM THE EXCISE TAX ON
AGRICULTURAL DATA TRANSACTIONS PURSUANT TO SECTION 35-2.5-104;
AND
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 6-1-105, add
(1)(qqqq) as follows:
6-1-105. Unfair or deceptive trade practices - definitions.
(1) A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the
course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation, the person:
(qqqq) VIOLATES ARTICLE 2.5 OF TITLE 35.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, add
(38)(a)(II) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies
-22- HB26-1270

and functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(38) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2037:
(II) THE REGULATION OF DATA TRANSACTIONS INVOLVING
AGRICULTURAL DATA AND THE IMPACT OF THE REGULATIONS ON
AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTION IN COLORADO IN ACCORDANCE WITH
ARTICLE 2.5 OF TITLE 35.
SECTION 7. Applicability. This act applies to data transactions
and conduct occurring on or after July 1, 2027.
SECTION 8. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-23- HB26-1270